West Virginia, session 2026, SB805.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 66. SUPPORT FOR MOTHERS AND BABIES ACT. §16-66-1. Definitions. The following terms are defined:"Abortion industry organization" means any organization that performs, prescribes, refers for, encourages or promotes abortion as an option for a pregnant woman, or owns, operates, or manages a facility where abortions are performed and prescribed. "Abortion pill reversal" means the use of progesterone by a licensed health care provider for the purposes of counteracting the effects of ingested mifepristone as part of a chemical abortion. "Chemical abortion" means the use or prescription of an abortion-inducing drug dispensed with the intent to cause an abortion."Organization" means the entire legal entity, including any entity or affiliate that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with such an entity."Pregnancy help organization" means an organization that seeks to provide a range of services to pregnant women. Pregnancy help organizations do not perform, prescribe, refer for or encourage abortion, as defined above, nor do they affiliate with any organization that performs, prescribes, refers for, or encourages abortion. Pregnancy help organizations include, but are not limited to, organizations traditionally known as "crisis pregnancy organizations," maternity homes, adoption agencies, and social services agencies that provide material support and other assistance to pregnant women.  "Management agency" means an organization that contracts with the Bureau for Public Health, or department thereof to manage the West Virginia Mothers and Babies Pregnancy Support Program."Subcontractor" means a pregnancy help organization that contracts with the management agency to provide Pregnancy Support Program services to individuals. §16-66-2. Establishing the West Virginia Mothers and Babies Pregnancy Support Program. (a) The West Virginia Mothers and Babies Pregnancy Support Program under the Bureau for Public Health is continued.(b) A pregnancy help organization is eligible to receive funding from the program, subject to meeting the standards defined by the managing agency.(c) An abortion industry organization may not receive funding from the program.(d) (1) The program’s funds may be distributed to pregnancy help organizations eligible under this article for the following reasons:(A) Capital expenditures;(B) Expenditures associated with adding additional services;(C) Expenditures associated with meeting the requirements established by relevant licensing, accreditation, or standards setting organizations; and(D) Training expenditures for pregnancy help organization staff and volunteers; and(E) Expenditures associated with the abortion pill reversal. (2) Except as provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection, funds distributed under the program shall be distributed on a fee per service arrangement with a fee per service and hour arrangement as set by the management agency. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home